test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verb-odd_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable verbs belonging to COASKKIT_IV, MUITAL_TV, MUITTASJ_TV, ALIST_IV, BEAGASJ_IV, HURAI_IV, LASSAN_IV, GEAGAT_TV

Tests:
  Verb - dálvvadit: # COASKKIT_IV
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dálvvada
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: dálvvadivččii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth: dálvvadivččui
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [dálvvadeš, dálvvadeaš, dálvvadeažžá]
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ger: dálvvadettiin
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/alla+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadalai

  Verb - duippidit: # MUITAL_TV
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: duippidetne
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [duippide, duippidedne]
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [duippidedje, duippide]
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: duippidivččiime
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [duippidivččuime, duippidivččiime]
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: duippidivččuime
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: duippidivčče
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: duippidivččo
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [duippideš, duippideaš, duippideažžá]
    duippidit+V+TV+Ger: duippidettiin

  Verb - bisttašit: # MUITTASJ_TV
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bisttašetne
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [bisttaše, bisttašedne]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bisttašedje, bisttaše]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bisttašivččiime
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [bisttašivččuime, bisttašivččiime]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: bisttašivččuime
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bisttašivčče
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: bisttašivččo
    bisttašit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bisttašeš, bisttašeaš, bisttašeažžá]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ger: bisttašettiin

  Verb - huobastit: # ALIST_IV
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: huobastetne
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [huobaste, huobastedne]
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [huobastedje, huobaste]
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: huobastivččiime
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [huobastivččuime, huobastivččiime]
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: huobastivččuime
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: huobastivčče
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: huobastivččo
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [huobasteš, huobasteaš, huobasteažžá]
    huobastit+V+IV+Ger: huobastettiin

  Verb - bivššihit: # BEAGASJ_IV
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bivššihetne
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [bivššihe, bivššihedne]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bivššihedje, bivššihe]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bivššihivččiime
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [bivššihivččuime, bivššihivččiime]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: bivššihivččuime
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bivššihivčče
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: bivššihivččo
    bivššihit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bivššiheš, bivššiheaš, bivššiheažžá]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ger: bivššihettiin

  Verb - bohraidit: # HURAI_IV
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bohraidetne
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [bohraide, bohraidedne]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bohraidedje, bohraide]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: bohraidivččiime
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [bohraidivččuime, bohraidivččiime]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: bohraidivččuime
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: bohraidivčče
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: bohraidivččo
    bohraidit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bohraideš, bohraideaš, bohraideažžá]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ger: bohraidettiin

  Verb - čohkánit: # LASSAN_IV
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: čohkánetne
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [čohkáne, čohkánedne]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [čohkanedne, čohkane, čohkkane, čohkkanedne]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [čohkkanetne, čohkanetne]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [čohkánedje, čohkáne]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [čohkane, čohkanedje, čohkkane, čohkkanedje]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: čohkánivččiime
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth-a/á+Du1: [čohkánivččuime, čohkánivččiime]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [čohkanivččuime, čohkanivččiime, čohkkanivččuime, čohkkanivččiime]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: [čohkanivččuime, čohkkanivččuime]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [čohkanivččiime, čohkkanivččiime]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: čohkánivččuime
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čohkánivčče
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: čohkánivččo
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: [čohkanivččo, čohkkanivččo]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [čohkanivčče, čohkkanivčče]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čohkáneš, čohkáneaš, čohkáneažžá]
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čohkaneš, čohkaneaš, čohkaneažžá, čohkkaneš, čohkkaneaš, čohkkaneažžá]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ger: čohkánettiin
    čohkánit+Err/Orth-a/á+V+IV+Ger: [čohkanettiin, čohkkanettiin]
    
  Verb - buovadit: # GEAGAT_TV
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: buovadetne
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [buovade, buovadedne]
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [buovadedje, buovade]
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: buovadivččiime
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Du1: [buovadivččuime, buovadivččiime]
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Du1: buovadivččuime
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: buovadivčče
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth+Pl3: buovadivččo
    buovadit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [buovadeš, buovadeaš, buovadeažžá]
    buovadit+V+TV+Ger: buovadettiin
